Illinois, session 104th, SB4040.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 527A-7.5 and 27A-9 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27A-7.5)7    Sec. 27A-7.5. Fee; State Charter School Commission; 8abolition and transfer to State Board; local charter 9authorization pilot program; appeal hearing fee.10    (a) (Blank).11    (a-5) (Blank). 12    (b) (Blank).13    (c) (Blank).14    (d) (Blank).15    (e) (Blank).16    (f) (Blank).17    (g) (Blank).18    (g-5) (Blank). 19    (h) (Blank). 20    (i) (Blank).21    (j) The State Board may charge a charter school that it 22authorizes a fee not to exceed 3% of the revenue provided to 23the school to be used exclusively for covering the cost of   SB4040 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1authorizing activities. Authorizing activities may include, 2but are not limited to: (i) soliciting, reviewing, and taking 3action on charter school proposals; (ii) hiring, training, and 4supervising staff engaged in authorizing activities; (iii) 5developing and conducting oversight, including regular 6monitoring, of authorized charter schools; (iv) reporting on 7best practices and performances of charter schools; (v) 8applying for, managing, and distributing grants and funds 9appropriated for charter schools and authorizing activities; 10(vi) training members of the State Board on their authorizing 11roles; and (vii) training other employees of the State Board 12on how to work with charter schools as their own local 13education agencies. 14    (k) On July 1, 2020, the State Charter School Commission 15or "Commission" (established by Public Act 97-152 as an 16independent State agency with statewide chartering 17jurisdiction and authority) is abolished and the terms of all 18members end. On that date, all of the powers, duties, assets, 19liabilities, contracts, property, records, and pending 20business of the Commission are transferred to the State Board. 21For purposes of the Successor Agency Act and Section 9b of the 22State Finance Act, the State Board is declared to be the 23successor agency of the Commission. Beginning on July 1, 2020, 24references in statutes, rules, forms, and other documents to 25the Commission shall, in appropriate contexts, be deemed to 26refer to the State Board. Standards and procedures of the   SB4040 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1Commission in effect on July 1, 2020 shall be deemed standards 2and procedures of the State Board and shall remain in effect 3until amended or repealed by the State Board.4    On July 1, 2020, any charter school authorized by the 5Commission prior to July 1, 2020 shall have its authorization 6transferred to the State Board, which shall then become the 7school's authorizer for all purposes under this Article. On 8July 1, 2020, all of the powers, duties, assets, liabilities, 9contracts, property, records, and pending business of the 10Commission as the school's authorizer must be transferred to 11the State Board. At the end of its charter term, a charter 12school may reapply to the board or boards for authorization.13    On July 1, 2020, all rules of the State Board applicable to 14matters falling within the responsibility of the Commission 15shall be applicable to the actions of the State Board. 16    (k-5) On July 1, 2027, there is established a local 17charter authorization pilot program under which authorization 18of some State-authorized charter schools shall be returned to 19the local school board or boards, in accordance with 20subsection (a-5) of Section 27A-9. 21    (l) In any appeal filed with the State Board under this 22Article, both the applicant and the authorizing school 23district of the charter school shall have the right to request 24a hearing before the State Board. If more than one entity 25requests a hearing, then the State Board may hold only one 26hearing, wherein the applicant and the school district shall   SB4040 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1have an equal opportunity to present their respective 2positions. 3(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 4    (105 ILCS 5/27A-9)5    Sec. 27A-9. Term of charter; transfer of authorization; 6renewal. 7    (a) An initial charter shall be granted for a period of 5 8school years. A charter may be renewed in incremental periods 9not to exceed 10 school years. Authorizers shall ensure that 10every charter granted on or after January 1, 2017 includes 11standards and goals for academic, organizational, and 12financial performance. A charter must meet all standards and 13goals for academic, organizational, and financial performance 14set forth by the authorizer in order to be renewed for a term 15in excess of 5 years but not more than 10 years. If an 16authorizer fails to establish standards and goals, a charter 17shall not be renewed for a term in excess of 5 years. Nothing 18contained in this Section shall require an authorizer to grant 19a full 10-year renewal term to any particular charter school, 20but an authorizer may award a full 10-year renewal term to 21charter schools that have a demonstrated track record of 22improving student performance. 23    (a-5) On July 1, 2027, any charter school (i) that is 24authorized by the State Board, (ii) that is located outside of 25the geographic area of a school district organized under   SB4040 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1Article 34, and (iii) whose authorization allows for the 2charter school to enroll students who reside within the 3geographic boundaries of more than one school district or to 4enroll students who reside within the geographic boundaries of 5a school district that has a student enrollment of at least 629,000 students shall have the charter school's authorization 7transferred to the local school board or boards of the 8districts from which the charter school draws enrollment. On 9July 1, 2027, all authorizer powers, duties, contracts, and 10pending business of the State Board as the charter school's 11authorizer must be transferred to the local school board or 12boards. All charter contract terms shall remain in full force 13and effect unless amended by mutual agreement of the parties, 14except that the term of the contract shall be 7 years starting 15July 1, 2027. All references in the charter contract to the 16State Board shall, in the appropriate context, be deemed to 17refer to the local school board or boards of the districts from 18which the charter school draws enrollment. Renewal or 19nonrenewal decisions of the local school board or boards at 20the end of the initial 7-year term shall be determined as 21provided in this Section.22    If a State-authorized charter school that is subject to 23transfer under this subsection is authorized to enroll 24students from more than one school district, the local school 25boards of the districts from which the charter school draws 26enrollment must establish a joint charter management team that   SB4040 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1consists of, at minimum, one administrator from each school 2district. The joint charter management team must develop and 3execute a charter oversight plan that is submitted to the 4State Board as part of the charter certification process. The 5plan must detail the respective roles and responsibilities of 6each of the local school boards that is a party to the 7agreement, including with respect to those authorizer powers 8and duties under Section 27A-7.10. A multi-district charter 9school may be held accountable only to one set of goals, 10objectives, pupil performance standards, and content 11standards.12    Nothing in this subsection may be construed as making a 13school district liable for any preexisting debt or obligation 14that a charter school may have undertaken prior to the 15transfer of authorization as described in this subsection.16    The State Board may adopt any rules that may be necessary 17to implement this subsection. 18    (b) A charter school renewal proposal submitted to the 19local school board or the State Board, as the chartering 20entity, shall contain:21        (1) a report on the progress of the charter school in 22    achieving the goals, objectives, pupil performance 23    standards, content standards, and other terms of the 24    initial approved charter proposal; and25        (2) a financial statement that discloses the costs of 26    administration, instruction, and other spending categories   SB4040 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1    for the charter school that is understandable to the 2    general public and that will allow comparison of those 3    costs to other schools or other comparable organizations, 4    in a format required by the State Board.5    (c) A charter may be revoked or not renewed if the local 6school board or the State Board, as the chartering entity, 7clearly demonstrates that the charter school did any of the 8following, or otherwise failed to comply with the requirements 9of this law:10        (1) Committed a material violation of any of the 11    conditions, standards, or procedures set forth in the 12    charter.13        (2) Failed to meet or make reasonable progress toward 14    achievement of the content standards or pupil performance 15    standards identified in the charter.16        (3) Failed to meet generally accepted standards of 17    fiscal management.18        (4) Violated any provision of law from which the 19    charter school was not exempted.20    In the case of revocation, the local school board or the 21State Board, as the chartering entity, shall notify the 22charter school in writing of the reason why the charter is 23subject to revocation. The charter school shall submit a 24written plan to the local school board or the State Board, 25whichever is applicable, to rectify the problem. The plan 26shall include a timeline for implementation, which shall not   SB4040 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1exceed 2 years or the date of the charter's expiration, 2whichever is earlier. If the local school board or the State 3Board, as the chartering entity, finds that the charter school 4has failed to implement the plan of remediation and adhere to 5the timeline, then the chartering entity shall revoke the 6charter. Except in situations of an emergency where the 7health, safety, or education of the charter school's students 8is at risk, the revocation shall take place at the end of a 9school year. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 10prohibit an implementation timetable that is less than 2 years 11in duration. No local school board may arbitrarily or 12capriciously revoke or not renew a charter. Except for 13extenuating circumstances outlined in this Section, if a local 14school board revokes or does not renew a charter, it must 15ensure that all students currently enrolled in the charter 16school are placed in schools that are higher performing than 17that charter school, as defined in the State's federal Every 18Student Succeeds Act accountability plan. In determining 19whether extenuating circumstances exist, a local school board 20must detail, by clear and convincing evidence, that factors 21unrelated to the charter school's accountability designation 22outweigh the charter school's academic performance. 23    (d) (Blank).24    (e) Notice of a local school board's decision to deny, 25revoke, or not renew a charter shall be provided to the State 26Board.   SB4040 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1    The State Board may reverse a local board's decision to 2revoke or not renew a charter if the State Board finds that the 3charter school or charter school proposal (i) is in compliance 4with this Article and (ii) is in the best interests of the 5students it is designed to serve. The State Board may 6condition the granting of an appeal on the acceptance by the 7charter school of funding in an amount less than that 8requested in the proposal submitted to the local school board. 9The State Board must appoint and utilize a hearing officer for 10any appeals conducted under this subsection. Final decisions 11of the State Board are subject to judicial review under the 12Administrative Review Law. 13    (f) Notwithstanding other provisions of this Article, if 14the State Board on appeal reverses a local board's decision or 15if a charter school is approved by referendum, the State Board 16shall act as the authorized chartering entity for the charter 17school and shall perform all functions under this Article 18otherwise performed by the local school board. The State Board 19shall report the aggregate number of charter school pupils 20resident in a school district to that district and shall 21notify the district of the amount of funding to be paid by the 22State Board to the charter school enrolling such students. The 23charter school shall maintain accurate records of daily 24attendance and student enrollment and shall enter data on the 25students served, their characteristics, their particular 26needs, the programs in which they participate, and their   SB4040 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1academic achievement into the statewide student information 2system established by the State Board. The State Board shall 3withhold from funds otherwise due the district the funds 4authorized by this Article to be paid to the charter school and 5shall pay such amounts to the charter school in quarterly 6installments, calculated as follows:7        (1) The amount of the first quarterly payment shall be 8    based on the projected number of students who will be 9    enrolled in the charter school in the upcoming school 10    year, multiplied by one-fourth of the resident district's 11    per capita tuition amount. Each charter school shall 12    submit its projected enrollment by no later than August 1 13    of each year on a form provided by the State Board for this 14    purpose.15        (2) The amount of the second quarterly payment shall 16    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the first 17    and second quarterly installments is equal to the number 18    of students reported as enrolled at the charter school on 19    October 1 in the State Board's student information system, 20    multiplied by one-half of the resident district's per 21    capita tuition amount.22        (3) The amount of the third quarterly payment shall be 23    based on the number of students enrolled in the charter 24    school on January 1, multiplied by one-fourth of the 25    resident district's per capita tuition amount. Each 26    charter school shall submit its January 1 enrollment by no   SB4040 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 20759 LNS 34263 b1    later than January 5 of each year on a form provided by the 2    State Board for this purpose. 3        (4) The amount of the fourth quarterly payment shall 4    be calculated such that the aggregate amount of the third 5    and fourth installments is equal to the number of students 6    reported as enrolled at the charter school on March 1 in 7    the State Board's student information system, multiplied 8    by one-half of the resident district's per capita tuition 9    amount. 10    (g) (Blank).11    (h) The State Board shall pay directly to a charter school 12it authorizes any federal or State funding attributable to a 13student with a disability attending the school. 14(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.)